en: Tip shape: Beveled (chisel); Pointed (sharp); Pointed (standard); Rounded; Other
ro-RO: Formă a vârfului: Teșit (daltă); Ascuțit (tăios); Ascuțit (standard); Rotunjit; Altele
sl-SI: Oblika konice: Poševno (dleto); Koničasto (ostro); Koničasto (standardno); Zaobljeno; Drugo
fi: Kärjen muoto: Viistetty (taltta); Suippokärkinen (terävä); Suippokärkinen (vakio); Pyöristetty; Muu
zh-TW: 撥片尖端形狀: 斜角 (鑿型); 尖頭 (銳利); 尖頭 (標準); 圓頭; 其他
it: Forme della punta: Smussato (a scalpello); A punta (affilato); A punta (standard); Arrotondato; Altro
cs: Tvar špičky: Zkosený (dlátový); Špičatý (ostrý); Špičatý (standardní); Zaoblený; Jiné
vi: Hình dạng đầu: Vát (hình cái đục); Nhọn (sắc); Nhọn (tiêu chuẩn); Bo tròn; Khác
fr: Forme de la pointe: Biseauté (ciseau); Pointu (acéré); Pointu (standard); Arrondi; Autre
lt-LT: Antgalio forma: Nuožulnus (kaltas); Smailus (aštrus); Smailus (standartinis); Suapvalintas; Kitas
pt-PT: Forma da ponta da palheta: Biselado (cinzel); Pontiagudo (afiado); Pontiagudo (padrão); Arredondado; Outro
el: Σχήμα μύτης: Λοξότμητο (σμίλη); Μυτερό (αιχμηρό); Μυτερό (τυπικό); Στρογγυλεμένο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Ponta formato: Chanfrado (cinzel); Pontiagudo (afiado); Pontiagudo (padrão); Arredondado; Outros
hu: Shapes: Lapos (véső alakú); Hegyes (éles); Hegyes (normál); Lekerekített; Egyéb
de: Spitzenform: Abgeschrägt (Meißel); Spitz (scharf); Spitz (Standard); Abgerundet; Sonstige
sk-SK: Tvar hrotu: Skosený (zrezaný); Špicatý (ostrý); Špicatý (štandardný); Zaoblený; Iné
ru: Форма наконечника: Скошенное (долото); Заострённое (острое); Заострённое (стандартное); Закруглённое; Другое
zh-CN: 拨片尖端形状: 斜面（凿形）; 尖头（锋利）; 尖头（标准）; 圆头; 其他
bg-BG: Форма на върха: Скосен (длето); Заострен (остър); Заострен (стандартен); Заоблен; Друго
pl: Kształt końcówki: Ścięta (dłuto); Spiczasta (ostra); Spiczasta (standardowa); Zaokrąglona; Inna
tr: Uç şekli: Eğimli (keski); Sivri (keskin); Sivri (standart); Yuvarlak; Diğer
th: รูปทรงปลาย: หน้าตัดเอียง (สิ่ว); ปลายแหลม (คม); ปลายแหลม (มาตรฐาน); ปลายมน; อื่นๆ
es: Forma de la punta: Biselada (cincel); Puntiaguda (afilada); Puntiaguda (estándar); Redondeada; Otro
ko: 팁 모양: 경사형(끌 모양); 뾰족한 형태(예리함); 뾰족한 형태(표준); 둥근 형태; 기타
hr-HR: Oblik vrha: Zakošeno (dlijeto); Šiljasto (oštro); Šiljasto (standardno); Zaobljeno; Ostalo
nl: Puntvorm: Afgeschuind (beitel); Puntig (scherp); Puntig (standaard); Afgerond; Overige
da: Spidsform: Affaset (mejsel); Spids (skarp); Spids (standard); Afrundet; Andet
sv: Spetsform: Fasad (mejsel); Spetsig (vass); Spetsig (standard); Rundad; Övrigt
nb: Spissform: Skråstilt (meisel); Spiss (skarp); Spiss (standard); Avrundet; Annet
ja: 先端形状: 斜角 (チゼル); 尖型 (シャープ); 尖型 (標準); 丸型; その他